Massachusetts, session 194th, H2288.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1A of chapter 40A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “authority” in line 39 the following:-
“; provided, however, that for the purposes of this section and section 3A, an ‘MBTA
community’ shall not include any city or town which does not have any direct bus, subway or
transit service”
of 1